Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-05146 16B.98 GRANTS MANAGEMENT PROCESS. Subd. 14. Administrative costs. Unless amounts are otherwise appropriated for administrative costs, a state agency may retain up to five percent of the amount appropriated to the agency for grants enacted by the legislature and formula grants and up to ten percent for competitively awarded grants. This subdivision applies to appropriations made for new grant programs enacted on or after July 1, 2023. This subdivision does not apply to grants funded with an appropriation of proceeds from the sale of state general obligation bonds.